test/src/morphology/N-kaqggwrz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kaʼggõrz: # Noun 230 'eng /est kaer/fin' - full paradigm
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Nom: kaʼggõrz
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Gen: kaʼggõr
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Par: kaʼggõrzt
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Dat: kaʼggõrõn
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Ins: kaʼggõrõks
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Ill: kaʼggõrõ
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Ela: kaʼggõrõst
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Nom: kaʼggõrd
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Gen: kaʼggõrd
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Par: kaʼggiri
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Dat: kaʼggõrdõn
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Ins: kaʼggõrdõks
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Ill: kaʼggiriž
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Ela: kaʼggirist
